Arkansas, session 2025, HB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-410, concerning the issuance,
revocation, and suspension of teaching licenses, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(k)(1) The state board shall issue a license to an individual who does
not meet the educational requirements of a traditional license and does not
qualify for licensure through other alternative educator preparation programs
if the individual has been approved for licensure and hire by a public school
district board of directors or a governing body of an open-enrollment public
charter school.
(2) A public school district board of directors or a governing
body of an open-enrollment public charter school that approves an individual
for licensure and hire under subdivision (k)(1) of this section shall submit
*TNL130*
01/29/2025 1:01:07 PM TNL130

HB1305
a letter to the state board that requests the issuance of a license to the
individual.
(3) An individual who is issued a license under this subsection
(k) shall have one (1) of the following:
(A) A bachelor's degree in a subject matter related to the
course material that he or she is being hired to teach;
(B) An associate degree or trade certification and five
(5) years of documented career experience in a subject matter related to the
course material that he or she is being hired to teach; or
(C) Ten (10) years of career experience in a subject
matter related to the course material that he or she is being hired to teach.
(4) An individual shall not be issued a teaching license under
this subsection if he or she has:
(A) A true report in the Child Maltreatment Central
Registry;
(B) Pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty
of any of the offenses under subsection (c) of this section by a court in the
State of Arkansas or of any similar offense by a court in another state or by
a federal court;
(C) Failed to apply for and pass a statewide and
nationwide criminal records check conducted by the Division of Arkansas State
Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation; or
(D) Failed to provide his or her fingerprints for a
statewide and nationwide criminal records check as required under § 6-17-417.
(5)(A) A license issued to an individual under this subsection
shall be valid for only the duration of his or her employment with the public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school that recommended him
or her for licensure under subdivision (k)(2) of this section.
(B) Upon the conclusion of the individual's employment
with the public school district or open-enrollment public charter school that
recommended him or her for licensure under subdivision (k)(2) of this
section, the individual's license under this subsection (k) shall expire.




01/29/2025 1:01:07 PM TNL130